California statutes. Unemployment Insurance Code
(b) If the employer, as defined in subdivision (a), for whom the employee performs or performed the service does not have control of the payment of wages for such services, “employer” (except for purposes of Section 13009) means the person having control of the payment of such wages, whether or not the person having control of the payment of such wages is subject to the jurisdiction of the laws of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1200, Sec. 91.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

13005.7.

An employment agency, as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) or (h) of Section 1812.501 of the Civil Code shall not be deemed the employer of the domestic worker for whom it procures, offers, refers, provides, or attempts to provide work if all of the factors set forth in Section 687.2 exist.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1275, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

13006.

“Gross income” means all compensation for services including fees, commissions, and similar items, except as otherwise provided by this division. “Gross income” shall specifically include those items relating to compensation specified by Article 2 (commencing with Section 17081) of, and shall specifically exclude those items relating to compensation specified by Article 3 (commencing with Section 17131) of, Chapter 3 of Part 10 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 847, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

13007.

“Miscellaneous payroll period” means a payroll period other than a daily, weekly, biweekly, semimonthly, monthly, quarterly, semiannual, or annual payroll period.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1007, Sec. 64.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 67 of Ch. 1007.)
-------------------------------------------

13008.

“Payroll period” means a period for which a payment of wages is ordinarily made to the employee by his or her employer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1007, Sec. 64.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 67 of Ch. 1007.)
-------------------------------------------

13009.

“Wages” means all remuneration, other than fees paid to a public official, for services performed by an employee for their employer, including all remuneration paid to a nonresident employee for services performed in this state, and the cash value of all remuneration paid in any medium other than cash, except as provided by this section. “Wages” includes tips received by an employee in the course of employment. The wages shall be deemed to be paid at the time a written statement including tips is furnished to the employer pursuant to Section 13055 or, if no statement including those tips is so furnished, at the time received. “Wages” includes compensation, that is deductible under Section 162 of the Internal Revenue Code, paid to a member of a limited liability
 company filing a federal corporate income tax return.

“Wages” shall not include remuneration paid under any of the following conditions:

(a) For agricultural labor, as defined in subdivision (g) of Section 3121 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(b) For domestic service in a private home, local college club, or local chapter of a college fraternity or sorority.

(c) For service not in the course of the employer’s trade or business performed in any calendar quarter by an employee, unless the cash remuneration paid for that service is fifty dollars ($50) or more and the service is performed by an individual who is regularly employed by the employer to perform the service. For
 purposes of this subdivision, an individual shall be deemed to be regularly employed by an employer during a calendar quarter only if either of the following conditions is met:

(1) On each of some 24 days during the quarter, the individual performs for the employer for some portion of the day service not in the course of the employer’s trade or business.

(2) The individual was regularly employed, as determined under paragraph (1), by the employer in the performance of the service during the preceding calendar quarter.

(d) For services by a citizen or resident of the United States for a foreign government or an international organization.

(e) For
 services performed by a nonresident individual who is not a citizen or national of the United States as designated by regulations prescribed by the department.

(f) For services performed by a duly ordained, commissioned, or licensed minister of a church in the exercise of their ministry or by a member of a religious order in the exercise of duties required by the order.

(g) (1) For services performed by an individual under the age of 18 years in delivery or distribution of newspapers or shopping news, not including delivery or distribution to any point for subsequent delivery or distribution.

(2) For services performed by an individual in, and at the time of, the sale of newspapers or magazines to ultimate
 consumers, under an arrangement under which the newspapers or magazines are to be sold by the individual at a fixed price, the individual’s compensation being based on the retention of the excess of the price over the amount at which the newspapers or magazines are charged to the individual whether or not the individual is guaranteed a minimum amount of compensation for the services, or is entitled to be credited with the unsold newspapers or magazines turned back.

(h) For services not in the course of the employer’s trade or business, to the extent paid in any medium other than cash.

(i) To, or on behalf of, an employee or their beneficiary under any of the following situations:

(1) From or to a trust which is
 exempt from tax under Section 17631 of the Revenue and Taxation Code at the time of payment, unless the payment is made to an employee of the trust as remuneration for services rendered as an employee and not as a beneficiary of the trust.

(2) Under or to an annuity plan which, at the time of payment, is a plan qualified pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17501) of Part 10 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(3) Under or to a bond purchase plan which, at the time of payment, is a bond purchase plan qualified pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17501) of Part 10 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(4) For a payment which qualifies for deduction by an employee pursuant
 to Section 219 of the Internal Revenue Code if, at the time of payment, it is reasonable to believe that the employee will be entitled to a deduction under that section for payment.

(5) Under a cafeteria plan (within the meaning of Section 125 of the Internal Revenue Code).

(j) To a master, officer, or any other seaman who is a member of a crew on a vessel engaged in foreign, coastwise, intercoastal, interstate, or noncontiguous trade.

(k) Pursuant to any provision of law other than Section 5(c) of the Peace Corps Act (22 U.S.C. Sec. 2504(c)) or 6(1) of the Peace Corps Act (22 U.S.C. Sec. 2505(1)), for service performed as a volunteer or volunteer leader within the meaning of that act.

(l) In the form of group-term life insurance on the life of an employee.

(m) To or on behalf of an employee, and to the extent that, at the time of the payment of remuneration it is reasonable to believe that a corresponding deduction is allowable for moving expenses pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 17201) of Chapter 3 of Part 10 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(n) (1) As tips in any medium other than cash.

(2) As cash tips to an employee in any calendar month in the course of employment by an employer, unless the amount of the cash tips is twenty dollars ($20) or more.

(o) For service performed by an
 individual on a boat engaged in catching fish or other forms of aquatic animal life under an arrangement with the owner or operator of the boat pursuant to which all of the following apply:

(1) The individual does not receive any cash remuneration, other than as provided in paragraph (2).

(2) The individual receives a share of the boat’s (or the boats’ in the case of a fishing operation involving more than one boat) catch of fish or other forms of aquatic animal life or a share of the proceeds from the sale of the catch.

(3) The amount of the individual’s share depends on the amount of the boat’s (or the boats’ in the case of a fishing operation involving more than one boat) catch of fish or other forms of aquatic
 animal life.

This subdivision shall apply only where the operating crew of the boat (or each boat from which the individual receives a share in the case of a fishing operation involving more than one boat) is normally made up of fewer than 10 individuals.

(p) For any medical care reimbursement made to, or for the benefit of, an employee under a self-insured medical reimbursement plan pursuant to Section 105(h)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(q) To, or on behalf of, an employee to the extent not includable in gross income pursuant to Section 13006.

(r) For services to which Section 633 applies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 296, Sec. 60.   (AB 1096)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

13009.5.

(a) For purposes of the report required by subdivision (a) of Section 1088 and the statement required by Section 13050, “wages subject to personal income tax” means all of the following:

(1) Remuneration defined as wages by Section 13009, except that in the case of tips received by an employee in the course of his or her employment, the amounts shall include only those tips included in statements furnished to the employer, pursuant to Section 13055.

(2) Remuneration described in subdivisions (a), (b), (f), and (l) of Section 13009, to the extent included in gross income.

(3) Payments made by a third party for sick pay as specified in Section 931.5.

(A) Any employer who receives a report of wages from a third-party payer as provided for in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 931.5 shall report those wages to the department as required under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1088.

(B) Any third-party payer described in Section 931.5 who fails to report wages to an employer as provided for in that section shall report those wages to the department as required under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1088.

(b) (1) A person or entity shall not be required to register with the Employment Development Department solely for the purpose of reporting wages subject to personal income tax pursuant to Section 1088 unless that registration is otherwise required by this code.

(2) A person or entity shall not be required to withhold any tax under Section 13020 for wages, as defined by this section, unless that person or entity is required to withhold tax for those wages as defined by Section 13009.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 144, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

13010.

“Withholding agent” means any person required to deduct and withhold any tax under the provisions of Section 13020.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1007, Sec. 64.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 67 of Ch. 1007.)
-------------------------------------------

13011.

The department shall retain the possession and control of all records, papers, offices, equipment, supplies, moneys, funds, appropriations, land, and other property real or personal held for the benefit or use of the Franchise Tax Board in the performance of the duties, powers, purposes, responsibilities, and jurisdiction of the Franchise Tax Board that were previously delegated by Section 15702.1 of the Government Code and that are vested in the department by Section 13000.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1007, Sec. 64.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 67 of Ch. 1007.)
-------------------------------------------

13013.

All regulations heretofore adopted by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to powers transferred to the department by this division and in effect immediately preceding the operative date of this division, shall remain in effect and shall be fully enforceable unless and until readopted, amended, or repealed by the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1007, Sec. 64.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 67 of Ch. 1007.)
-------------------------------------------

13014.

This division does not apply to the payment of interest obligations not taxable under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1007, Sec. 64.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 67 of Ch. 1007.)
-------------------------------------------

13015.

The department is authorized to require such information with respect to persons subject to the taxes imposed by this division as is necessary or helpful in securing proper identification of such persons.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1007, Sec. 64.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 67 of Ch. 1007.)
-------------------------------------------

13016.

When necessary to make effective the provisions of this division, the name and address of the recipient of income shall be furnished upon demand of the person paying the income.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1007, Sec. 64.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 67 of Ch. 1007.)
-------------------------------------------

13017.

Unless otherwise specifically provided, the provisions of any law effecting changes in withholding under this division shall begin in the manner set forth by Section 18665 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 877, Sec. 96.   Effective October 6, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 102 of Ch. 877.)
-------------------------------------------

13018.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by this division or other express provision of law, the information furnished or secured pursuant to this division shall be used solely for the purpose of administering the tax laws or other laws administered by the person or agency obtaining it. Any willful unauthorized inspection or unwarranted disclosure or use of the information by the person or agency, or the employees and officers thereof, is a misdemeanor. For purposes of this section, “inspection” means any examination of confidential information furnished or secured pursuant to this division.

(b) The department shall notify a taxpayer of any known incidents of willful unauthorized inspection or unwarranted disclosure or use of the taxpayer’s confidential tax records, but only if criminal charges have been filed for the willful unauthorized inspection or unwarranted disclosure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 623, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

13019.

(a) (1) With respect to tax advice, the protections of confidentiality that apply to a communication between a client and an attorney, as set forth in Article 3 (commencing with Section 950) of Chapter 4 of Division 8 of the Evidence Code, also shall apply to a communication between a taxpayer and any federally authorized tax practitioner to the extent the communication would be considered a privileged communication if it were between a client and an attorney.

(2) Paragraph (1) may only be asserted in any noncriminal tax matter before the Employment Development Department.

(3) For purposes of this section:

(A) “Federally authorized tax practitioner” means any individual who is authorized under federal law to practice before the Internal Revenue Service if the practice is subject to federal regulation under Section 330 of Title 31 of the United States Code, as provided by federal law as of January 1, 2000.

(B) “Tax advice” means advice given by an individual with respect to a state tax matter, which may include federal tax advice if it relates to the state tax matter. For purposes of this subparagraph, “federal tax advice” means advice given by an individual within the scope of his or her authority to practice before the federal Internal Revenue Service on noncriminal tax matters.

(C) “Tax shelter” means a partnership or other entity, any investment plan or arrangement, or any other plan or arrangement if a significant purpose of that partnership, entity, plan, or
 arrangement is the avoidance or evasion of federal income tax.

(b) The privilege under subdivision (a) shall not apply to any written communication between a federally authorized tax practitioner and a director, shareholder, officer, or employee, agent, or representative of a corporation in connection with the promotion of the direct or indirect participation of the corporation in any tax shelter, or in any proceeding to revoke or otherwise discipline any license or right to practice by any governmental agency.

(c) This section shall be operative for communications made on or after the effective date of the act adding this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 411, Sec. 3.   (AB 129)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Withholding and Payment of Tax [13020. - 13031.]

13020.

(a) (1) Every employer who pays wages to a resident employee for services performed either within or without this state, or to a nonresident employee for services performed in this state, shall deduct and withhold from those wages, except as provided in subdivision (c) and Sections 13025 and 13026, for each payroll period, a tax computed in that manner as to produce, so far as
 practicable, with due regard to the credits for personal exemptions allowable under Section 17054 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, a sum which is substantially equivalent to the amount of tax reasonably estimated to be due under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code resulting from the inclusion in the gross income of the employee of the wages which were subject to withholding. The method of determining the amount to be withheld shall be prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to Section 18663 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(2) For each payroll period ending on or after November 1, 2009, the sum shall comport with the changes made to Section 18663 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, by the act adding this paragraph.

(b) The department upon request may permit the use of accounting machines to calculate the proper amount to be
 deducted and withheld from wages, if the calculation produces an amount substantially equivalent to the amount of tax required to be withheld under subdivision (a).

(c) Withholding shall not be required by this section with respect to wages, salaries, fees, or other compensation paid by a corporation for services performed in California for that corporation to a nonresident corporate director for director services, including attendance at a board of directors’ meeting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 15, Sec. 5.   (AB 17 4x)   Effective October 23, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

13021.

(a) Every employer required to withhold any tax under Section 13020 shall for each calendar quarter, whether or not wages or payments are paid in the quarter, file a withholding report, a quarterly return, as described in subdivision (a) of Section 1088, and a report of wages in a form prescribed by the department, and pay over the taxes so required to be withheld. The report of wages shall include individual amounts required to be withheld under Section 13020 or withheld under Section 13028. Except as provided in subdivisions (c) and (d), the employer shall file a withholding report, a quarterly return, as described in subdivision (a) of Section 1088, and a report of wages, and remit the total amount of income taxes withheld during the calendar
 quarter on or before the last day of the month following the close of the calendar quarter.

(b) Every employer electing to file a single annual return under subdivision (d) of Section 1110 shall report and pay any taxes withheld under Section 13020 on an annual basis within the time specified in subdivision (d) of Section 1110.

(c) (1) Effective January 1, 1995, whenever an employer is required, for federal income tax purposes, to remit the total amount of withheld federal income tax in accordance with Section 6302 of the Internal Revenue Code and regulations thereunder, and the accumulated amount of state income tax withheld is more than five hundred dollars ($500), the employer shall remit the total amount of income tax withheld for state income tax
 purposes within the number of business days as specified for withheld federal income taxes by Section 6302 of the Internal Revenue Code, and regulations thereunder.

(2) Effective January 1, 1996, the five hundred dollar ($500) amount referred to in paragraph (1) shall be adjusted annually as follows, based on the annual average rate of interest earned on the Pooled Money Investment Account as of June 30 in the prior fiscal year:Average Rate of InterestGreater than or equal to 9
 percent:$ 75Less than 9 percent, but greater than or equal to
7 percent: 
 250Less than 7 percent, but greater than or equal to
4 percent: 
 400Less than 4
 percent: 500(d) (1) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (c), for calendar years beginning on and after January 1, 1995, if in the 12-month period ending June 30 of the prior year, the cumulative average payment made pursuant to this division or Section 1110 for any deposit periods, as described under Section 6302 of the Internal Revenue Code and regulations thereunder, was twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) or more, the employer shall remit the total amount of income tax withheld within the number of business days as specified for filing federal income taxes by Section 6302 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to mode or time of collection, and regulations
 thereunder. For purposes of this subdivision, payment shall be made by electronic funds transfer in accordance with Section 13021.5, for one calendar year beginning on January 1. Payment is deemed complete on the date the electronic funds transfer is initiated if settlement to the state’s demand account occurs on or before the business day following the date the transfer is initiated. If settlement to the state’s demand account does not occur on or before the business day following the date the transfer is initiated, payment is deemed complete on the date settlement occurs. The department shall, on or before October 31 of the prior year, notify all employers required by this paragraph to make payments by electronic funds transfer of these requirements.

(2) Effective January 1, 2017, paragraph (1) shall not apply to an employer subject to
 the electronic filing requirements of Section 1088. Effective January 1, 2017, an employer subject to the electronic filing requirements of Section 1088 shall remit the total amount of income tax withheld within the number of business days specified in Section 6302 of the Internal Revenue Code and the regulations adopted thereunder for filing federal income taxes. Payment shall be deemed complete on the date the electronic funds transfer is initiated if settlement to the state’s demand account occurs on or before the business day following the date the transfer is initiated. If settlement to the state’s demand account does not occur on or before the business day following the date the transfer is initiated, payment is deemed complete on the date settlement occurs.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (2), effective January 1, 1995,
 electronic funds transfer payments that are subject to the one-day deposit rule, as described by Section 6302 of the Internal Revenue Code and regulations thereunder, shall be deemed timely if the payment settles to the state’s demand account within three business days after the date the employer meets the threshold for the one-day deposit rule.

(4) Any taxpayer required to remit payments pursuant to
 paragraphs (1) and (2) may request from the department a waiver of those requirements. The department may grant a waiver only if it determines that the particular amount paid in excess of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), as stated in paragraph (1) was the result of an unprecedented occurrence for that employer, and was not representative of the employer’s cumulative average payment in prior years.

(5) A state agency required to remit payments pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) may request a waiver of those requirements from the department. The department may grant a waiver if it determines that there will not be a negative impact on the interest earnings of the General Fund. If there is a negative impact to the General Fund, the department may grant a waiver if the requesting state agency follows procedures designated by
 the department to mitigate the impact to the General Fund.

(e) An employer not required to make payment pursuant to subdivision (d) may elect to make payment by electronic funds transfer in accordance with Section 13021.5 under the following conditions:

(1) The election shall be made in a form, and shall contain information, as prescribed by the director, and shall be subject to approval by the department.

(2) If approved, the election shall be effective on the date specified in the notification to the employer of approval.

(3) The election shall be operative from the date specified in the notification of approval, and shall continue in effect until terminated
 by the employer or the department.

(4) Funds remitted by electronic funds transfer pursuant to this subdivision shall be deemed complete in accordance with subdivision (d) or as deemed appropriate by the director to encourage use of this payment method.

(f) Notwithstanding Section 1112, interest and penalties shall not be assessed against an employer that remits at least 95 percent of the amount required by subdivision (c) or (d) if the failure to remit the full amount is not willful and any remaining amount due is paid with the next payment. The director may allow any employer to submit the amounts due from multiple locations upon a showing that those submissions are necessary to comply with subdivision (c) or (d).

(g) The department may, if it believes that action is necessary, require any employer to make the report or return required by this section and pay to it the tax deducted and withheld at any time, or from time to time but no less frequently than provided for in subdivision (a).

(h) An employer required to withhold any tax and that is not required to make payment under subdivision (c) shall remit the total amount of income tax withheld during each month of each calendar quarter, on or before the 15th day of the subsequent month if the income tax withheld for any of the three months or, cumulatively for two or more months, is three hundred fifty dollars ($350) or more.

(i) For purposes of subdivisions (a), (c), and (h), payment that is not required to be made by
 electronic funds transfer is deemed complete when it is placed in a properly addressed envelope, bearing the correct postage, and it is deposited in the United States mail.

(j) (1) In addition to the withholding report, quarterly return, and report of wages described in subdivision (a), each employer shall file with the director an annual reconciliation return showing the amount required to be withheld under Section 13020, and any other information the director shall prescribe. This annual reconciliation return shall be due on the first day of January following the close of the prior calendar year and shall become delinquent if not filed on or before the last day of that month.

(2) The requirement to file the annual reconciliation return for the prior
 calendar year under this subdivision shall not apply to the 2012 calendar year and thereafter.

(k) The requirement in subdivision (a) to file a quarterly return shall begin with the first calendar quarter of the 2011 calendar year.

(l) The changes made to this section by Chapter 783 of the Statutes of 2012 shall apply on and after January 1, 2013.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 222, Sec. 7.   (AB 1245)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

13021.5.

(a) “Electronic funds transfer” means a transfer of funds, other than a transaction originated by check, draft, or similar paper instrument, that is initiated through an electronic terminal, telephonic instrument, or computer or magnetic tape, so as to order, instruct, or authorize a financial institution to debit or credit an account. Electronic funds transfers shall be accomplished by an automated
 clearinghouse debit, an automated clearinghouse credit, Fedwire, or by other specific electronic funds transfer methods approved in advance by the department.

(b) “Automated clearinghouse” means a federal reserve bank, or an organization established in agreement with the National Automated Clearing House Association, that operates as a clearinghouse for transmitting or receiving entries between banks and/or bank accounts and which authorizes an electronic transfer of funds between those banks or bank accounts.

(c) “Automated clearinghouse debit” means a transaction in which the state, through its designated depository bank, originates an automated clearinghouse transaction debiting the employer’s bank account and crediting the state’s bank account for the amount of tax. Banking costs incurred for the automated clearinghouse debit transaction shall be paid by the state.

(d) “Automated clearinghouse credit” means an automated clearinghouse transaction in which the employer, through its own bank, originates an entry crediting the state’s bank account and debiting its own bank account. Banking costs incurred for the automated clearinghouse credit transaction charged to the employer and to the state shall be paid by the employer.

(e) “Fedwire” means a transaction originated by the employer and utilizing the national electronic payment system to transfer funds through the federal reserve banks, pursuant to which the employer debits its own bank account and credits the state’s bank account. Electronic funds transfer payments may be made by Fedwire only if prior approval is obtained from the department and payment cannot, for good cause, be made pursuant to subdivision (a). Banking costs incurred for the Fedwire transaction charged to the employer and to
 the state shall be paid by the employer.

(f) “Business day” means any day other than a Saturday, Sunday, legal holiday as recognized by the Internal Revenue Service, statewide legal holiday as recognized by the State of California pursuant to Section 6700 of the Government Code, or a day in which the department is closed pursuant to Section 12b of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(g) “Settlement date” means the date on which an exchange of funds with respect to an entry is reflected on the books of the Federal Reserve Bank.

(h) For the purposes of Section 13021, the “cumulative average payment” means the cumulative dollar amount of deposits divided by the number of payments submitted during a given period. For the purposes of this section, the “cumulative average payment” may also be defined as a single annual deposit,
 when only one payment is made during the 12-month period ending June 30.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 783, Sec. 19.   (AB 1845)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

13022.

In determining the amount to be deducted and withheld under Section 13020, the wages may, at the election of the employer, be computed to the nearest dollar.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1007, Sec. 64.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 67 of Ch. 1007.)
-------------------------------------------

13023.

The department may, by regulation, permit employers to estimate the wages which will be paid to any employee in any quarter of the calendar year, to determine the amount to be deducted and withheld upon each payment of wages to such employee during such quarter as if the appropriate average of the wages so estimated constituted the actual wages paid, and to deduct and withhold upon any payment of wages to such employee, during such quarter such amount as may be necessary to adjust the amount actually deducted and withheld upon the wages of such employee during such quarter to the amount that would be required to be deducted and withheld during such quarter
 if the payroll period of the employee were quarterly.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1007, Sec. 64.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 67 of Ch. 1007.)
-------------------------------------------

13024.

The department may provide by authorized regulation, under such conditions and to such extent as it deems proper, for withholding in addition to that otherwise required under Section 13020 in cases in which the employer and employee agree to such additional withholding. Such additional withholding shall for all purposes be considered a tax required to be deducted and withheld under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1007, Sec. 64.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 67 of Ch. 1007.)
-------------------------------------------

13025.

In the case of remuneration paid in any medium other than cash for services performed by an individual as a retail salesperson for a person where the service performed by such individual for such person is ordinarily performed for remuneration solely by way of cash commission an employer shall not be required to deduct or withhold any tax under this division with respect to such remuneration, if such employer files with the department such information with respect to such remuneration as the department may prescribe by regulation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1007, Sec. 64.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 67 of Ch. 1007.)
-------------------------------------------

13026.

An employer shall not be required to deduct and withhold any tax under this division upon a payment of wages (except wages exempt from federal income tax but not exempt under this division) to an employee if there is in effect with respect to such payment a withholding exemption certificate, in such form and containing such other information as the department may prescribe, furnished to the employer by the employee certifying that the employee—

(a) Incurred no liability for federal income tax imposed under subtitle A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 for his or her preceding taxable year,
 and

(b) Anticipates that he or she will incur no liability for federal income tax imposed under subtitle A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 for his or her current taxable year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1007, Sec. 64.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 67 of Ch. 1007.)
-------------------------------------------

13027.

In the case of tips which constitute wages, subdivision (a) of Section 13020 shall be applicable only to such tips as are included in a written statement furnished to the employer pursuant to Section 13055, and only to the extent that the tax can be deducted and withheld by the employer, at or after the time such statement is so furnished and before the close of the calendar year in which such statement is furnished, from such wages of the employee (excluding tips, but including funds turned over by the employee to the employer for the purpose of such deduction and withholding) as are under the control of the employer. An employer who is furnished by an
 employee a written statement of tips (received in a calendar month) pursuant to Section 13055 to which paragraph (2) of subdivision (n) of Section 13009 is applicable may deduct and withhold the tax with respect to such tips from any wages of the employee (excluding tips) under his or her control, even though at the time such statement is furnished the total amount of the tips included in statements furnished to the employer as having been received by the employee in such calendar month in the course of his or her employment by the employer is less than twenty dollars ($20). Such tax shall not at any time be deducted and withheld in any amount which exceeds the aggregate of such wages and funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1007, Sec. 64.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 67 of Ch. 1007.)
-------------------------------------------

13028.

(a) For purposes of this division (and so much of Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) and Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code as relates to this division) pensions, annuities, and other deferred income, as described in Section 3405 of the Internal Revenue Code, are wages and subject to withholding under this division. Amounts withheld shall be treated as if the amounts are withheld by an employer for a payroll period and only amounts withheld shall be reported to the department pursuant
 to Section 1088 and Section 13021.

(b) If an individual makes an election under Section 3405(a)(2) or Section 3405(b)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code not to have tax withheld, that election shall apply to withholding under this division, unless the individual elects, with the consent of the payer, to have those payments subject to withholding under this division. If an individual has not made an election under Section 3405(a)(2) or Section 3405(b)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, that individual may elect to exclude those payments from withholding under this division. Elections provided in this subdivision shall be made pursuant to regulations of the director.

(c) Where Section 3405 of the Internal Revenue Code provides that tables or other computational procedures shall be prescribed by the Secretary of the Treasury, for the purposes of this division, any of the following amounts
 may be withheld, upon election of the payer:

(1) An amount determined by the method prescribed under Section 13020.

(2) A designated dollar amount as requested by the payee.

(3) Ten percent of the amount of federal withholding computed pursuant to Section 3405 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(d) Where the amount of withholding computed pursuant to subdivision (c) is less than ten dollars ($10) per month, the payer shall not be required to withhold that amount.

(e) This section shall not apply to pensions, annuities, and other deferred income of payees with addresses outside this state, as shown on the most current records of the payer.

(f) The department shall, in consultation with the affected payers and payees, issue regulations to implement this section.

Those regulations shall provide for delay (but not beyond July 1, 1987) of the application of this section with respect to any payer or class of payers until that time as the payers are able to comply without undue hardship with the requirements of this section. In that case, no retroactive compliance shall be required.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 29, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

13028.1.

If the director determines that nonpayment of tax by a nonresident under the income tax laws of this state may occur, the director shall notify the payer of payments described in subdivision (a) of Section 13028 that withholding shall be made from those payments. Upon notice from the director, the payer shall withhold from those payments as if they were subject to Section 13020. The director shall also notify the payee that withholding has been ordered pursuant to this section, and the reason for his or her determination that nonpayment of tax may occur.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 159, Sec. 23.   Effective July 8, 1985.   Operative July 1, 1986, by Sec. 27 of Ch. 159.)
-------------------------------------------

13028.5.
